Illinois, session 104th, SB1039.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Youth Mental Health Protection Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (405 ILCS 48/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Youth 8Mental Health Protection Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-411, eff. 1-1-16.)